Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1552.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 205.130 to
205.220.
SECTION 2. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the county clerk shall
notify the owner of record of real property upon receipt of an instrument that affects the
title to the real property and is required to be recorded under ORS 205.130 (2)(a). The notice
shall be sent to the owner’s last known address in the records of the county clerk.
(2) The county clerk is not required to provide notice to the owner of record of the
property if the instrument is presented for recordation by:
(a) A financial institution described in ORS 205.460 (7);
(b) An insurer with a certificate of authority to transact title insurance in this state;
(c) A licensee or associate licensee of the Oregon State Bar authorized to practice real
estate law in this state; or
(d) An employee or agent presenting the instrument on behalf of a person described in
paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of this subsection.
(3) The county clerk may charge the person presenting an instrument that requires no-
tice under subsection (1) of this section a per-instrument fee not to exceed the lesser of:
(a) $20; or
(b) The actual cost to the county clerk of providing the notice.
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.

NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 297